Hawaii statutes.
§482-22 Application for registration.
(a) Subject to the limitations set forth in this part, any person who uses a
mark may file in the office of the director, in a manner complying with the
requirements of the director, an application for registration of that mark
setting forth at least the following information:

(1) The name and business address of the person or
entity applying for such registration and the state of organization or
incorporation, or if a partnership, the state in which the partnership is
formed;

(2) The goods or services on or in connection with
which the mark is used, the mode or manner in which the mark is used on or in
connection with such goods or services, and the class in which such goods or
services fall;

(3) The date when the mark was first used anywhere,
and the date when it was first used in this State by the applicant or a
predecessor in interest; and

(4) A statement that the applicant is the owner of
the mark, the mark is in use, and to the knowledge of the person verifying the
application, no other person has registered, either federally or in this State,
or has the right to use, the mark either in the identical form thereof or in
such near resemblance thereto as to be likely, when applied to the goods or
services of the other person, to cause confusion, to cause mistake, or to
deceive.

(b) The director may also require a statement
as to whether an application to register the mark, or portions or a composite
thereof, has been filed by the applicant or a predecessor in interest in the
United States Patent and Trademark Office; and, if so, the applicant shall
fully disclose the filing date and serial number of each application, the
status of the application, and if any application was finally refused
registration or has otherwise not resulted in a registration, the reasons
therefor.

(c) The director may also require that a
drawing of the mark accompany the application and comply with requirements the
director may specify in rules.

(d) The application shall be signed and
verified by the applicant, a member of the firm, or an officer of the
corporation or association applying. The application shall be accompanied by
one specimen per class of goods or services showing the mark as actually used
on or in connection with such goods or services and the application fee payable
to the director. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §93]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next